https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Foreign_policy_of_Barack_Obama
Foreign policy of the Barack Obama administration - Wikipedia
Foreign policy of the Barack Obama administration From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia (Redirected from Foreign policy of Barack Obama) Jump to navigation Jump to search Main article: Presidency of Barack Obama This article is part of a series aboutBarack Obama Political positions Electoral history Early life and career Family Public image Pre-presidency Illinois State Senator 2004 DNC keynote address U.S. Senator from Illinois President of the United States Presidency Timeline Policies Economy Energy Foreign policy Obama Doctrine Foreign trips Pardons Social Space Appointments Cabinet Judges First term Campaign for the Presidency 2008 general election Primaries Transition 1st inauguration First 100 days Affordable Care Act Iraq Withdrawal Death of Osama bin Laden Benghazi attack Timeline '09 '10 '11 '12 Second term Reelection campaign 2012 general election Reactions 2nd inauguration Immigration executive action Iran deal Cuban thaw Timeline '13 '14 '15 '16 '17 Post-presidency Planned Library Obama Foundation One America Appeal Dreams from My Father The Audacity of Hope Nobel Peace Prize v t e The foreign policy of the Barack Obama administration was the foreign policy of the United States from 2009 to 2017, during the Presidency of Barack Obama. The term Obama Doctrine is frequently used to describe the principles of the Obama administration's foreign policy. Obama inherited the Iraq War, the Afghanistan War, and various aspects of the War on Terror, all of which began during the Bush administration. He presided over the gradual draw down of U.S. soldiers in Iraq, culminating in the near-total withdrawal of U.S. soldiers from Iraq in December 2011. After increasing the U.S. military presence in Afghanistan during his first term, Obama withdrew all but approximately 8,400 soldiers from Afghanistan during his second term.[1] In 2011, Obama presided over a mission that led to the death of Osama bin Laden, the organizer of the September 11 attacks. The number of prisoners at the Guantanamo Bay detention camp fell dramatically during Obama's tenure, but, despite Obama's hopes to close the detention camp, 41 inmates remained at Guantanamo by the time that Obama left office.[2] The Obama administration made increased use of drone strikes, particularly in Pakistan, targeting Al-Qaeda leaders such as Anwar al-Awlaki. In 2013, Edward Snowden revealed the existence of an extensive government surveillance program known as PRISM, which Obama defended as "a circumscribed, narrow system directed at us being able to protect our people."[3] In 2010, a series of protests across North Africa and the Middle East known as the Arab Spring broke out, eventually turning into more severe forms of unrest in several countries. Obama helped organize a NATO-led intervention in Libya, ultimately resulting in the fall of Muammar Gaddafi's regime. Obama declined to become deeply involved in Syria, which underwent a long, multi-party civil war between the government of Bashar al-Assad, the Syrian opposition, and the Salafi jihadist group known as ISIL. The U.S. supported the opposition throughout the civil war and occasionally executed strikes against ISIL. In 2014, after Russia annexed Crimea and intervened in Ukraine, Obama and other Western leaders imposed sanctions that contributed to a Russian financial crisis. Russia later intervened in the Syrian Civil War and interfered in the 2016 U.S. presidential election, earning condemnation from the Obama administration. Seeking to shift the focus of U.S. foreign policy to East Asia, Obama organized a multi-nation free trade agreement known as the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), but the TPP was not ratified by Congress. Smaller trade agreements with South Korea, Colombia, and Panama were approved by Congress and entered into force. Obama initiated the Cuban thaw, providing diplomatic recognition to Cuba for the first time since the 1960s. His administration also negotiated the Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action, an accord in which Iran agreed to limit its nuclear program. Contents 1 History 1.1 Background 1.2 Initial themes 1.3 Appointments 2 Africa 2.1 East Africa 2.1.1 Piracy 2.1.2 Somalia 2.1.3 Zimbabwe 2.2 Middle Africa 2.2.1 Democratic Republic of Congo 2.2.1.1 The Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act 2.3 North Africa 2.3.1 Egypt 2.3.2 Libya 2.4 West Africa 2.4.1 Mali 3 Arctic 4 Asia 4.1 East Asia 4.1.1 North Korea 4.1.2 Japan 4.2 South Asia 4.3 West Asia 4.3.1 War in Iraq 4.3.1.1 2014 Intervention 4.3.2 Iran 4.3.3 Israel 4.3.4 Syria 4.3.4.1 The "Red Line" ultimatum 4.3.5 Bahrain protests 4.3.6 Saudi Arabia 5 Europe 5.1 East Europe 5.1.1 Russia 5.1.2 Ukraine 6 North America 6.1 Canada 6.2 Cuba 6.3 Honduras 7 Oceania 7.1 New Zealand 8 South America 8.1 Argentina 8.2 Colombia 8.3 Venezuela 9 Other issues 9.1 NSA spying scandal 9.2 Muslim relations 9.3 Missile defense 10 See also 11 References 12 Further reading 12.1 Primary sources 13 External links History[edit] See also: Barack Obama 2008 presidential campaign and Presidential transition of Barack Obama Background[edit] International trips made by President Barack Obama during his time in office Obama gave his first major foreign policy speech of his campaign on April 23, 2007 to the Chicago Council on Global Affairs, in which he outlined his foreign policy objectives, stressing five key points: "bringing a responsible end to this war in Iraq and refocusing on the critical challenges in the broader region," "by building the first truly 21st century military and showing wisdom in how we deploy it," "by marshalling a global effort to meet a threat that rises above all others in urgency – securing, destroying, and stopping the spread of weapons of mass destruction," "rebuild and construct the alliances and partnerships necessary to meet common challenges and confront common threats", and "while America can help others build more secure societies, we must never forget that only the citizens of these nations can sustain them." President-elect Obama nominated former rival, Senator Hillary Clinton to serve as his Secretary of State on December 1, 2008, and chose to keep Secretary of Defense Robert Gates as his Secretary of Defense. He appointed General James L. Jones to serve as his National Security Advisor and nominated Governor of Arizona Janet Napolitano as Secretary of Homeland Security. Clinton stated during her confirmation hearings that she believed that "the best way to advance America's interests in reducing global threats and seizing global opportunities is to design and implement global solutions." She stated, "We must use what has been called "smart power", the full range of tools at our disposal – diplomatic, economic, military, political, legal and cultural – picking the right tool or combination of tools for each situation. With smart power, diplomacy will be the vanguard of our foreign policy."[4] During the last weeks before his inauguration, in addition to the several major conflicts in the world, fighting related to the Israeli–Palestinian conflict erupted anew, specifically in Gaza, between Israel and the Hamas-led government. The 2008–2009 Israel–Gaza conflict ended in an uneasy cease-fire on January 18, 2009, two days prior to Obama's inauguration. Initial themes[edit] Further information: First inauguration of Barack Obama Wikisource has original text related to this article: Barack Obama's Inaugural Address In his inaugural address, Obama, elaborating on his foreign policy, suggested that he hoped to begin the process of withdrawing from Iraq and continuing to focus on the conflict in Afghanistan. He also mentioned lessening the nuclear threat through "working tirelessly with old friends and former foes." He spoke about America's determination to combat terrorism by proclaiming that America's spirit is "stronger and cannot be broken – you cannot outlast us, and we will defeat you." To the Muslim world, Obama extended an invite to "a new way forward, based on mutual interest and mutual respect." He also said that the United States was willing to "extend a hand" to those "who cling to power through corruption and deceit" if they "are willing to unclench" their fists.[5] On his first full day as president, Obama called on Israel to open the borders of Gaza, detailing early plans on his administration's peace plans for the Israeli–Palestinian conflict.[6] Obama and Secretary of State Clinton named George Mitchell as Special Envoy for Middle East peace and Richard Holbrooke as special representative to Pakistan and Afghanistan on January 23, 2009.[7] The Mitchell appointment signaled that Clinton might stay away from the direct Secretary-level negotiating that her predecessor, Condoleezza Rice, had spent much effort on during the previous two years.[8] Within less than a week in her new position, Secretary of State Clinton already called almost 40 foreign leaders or foreign ministers.[9] She said the world was eager to see a new American foreign policy and that, "There is a great exhalation of breath going on around the world. We've got a lot of damage to repair."[9] She did indicate that not every past policy would be repudiated, and specifically said it was essential that the six-party talks over the North Korean nuclear weapons program continue.[10] Secretary of State Hillary Clinton arrives at the State Department on her first day greeted by a standing room only crowd of Department employees. His trip to Denmark, that failed to convince the International Olympic Committee to award the 2016 Summer Olympics to Chicago, made Denmark the sixteenth country Obama visited since becoming President on January 20, 2009. This edged out President's Gerald Ford and George H.W. Bush (both tied at 15 visits in their first year) to make Obama the most traveled first year President.[11] Appointments[edit] Further information: Confirmations of Barack Obama's Cabinet Obama's 2013 foreign policy team Joe Biden John Brennan Susan Rice James Clapper John Kerry The administration appointed, or allowed to remain in office, 2,465 ambassadors. Most were career diplomats. 805 were political appointees. 110 of 150 ambassadorships were political in the Caribbean; 259 out of 358 appointees in Western Europe were political. Career diplomats dominated all other areas including: North and Central America, South America, Africa, Eastern Europe, Middle East, East Asia, South Asia and Oceania. In Central Asia, all appointees were career.[12] Obama administration foreign policy personnel Vice President Biden (2009–2017) Secretary of State Clinton (2009–2013) Kerry (2013–2017) Secretary of Defense Gates (2006–2011) Panetta (2011–2013) Hagel (2013–2015) Carter (2015–2017) Ambassador to the United Nations Rice (2009–2013) Power (2013–2017) Director of National Intelligence Blair (2009–2010) Gompert (2010) Clapper (2010–2017) Director of the Central Intelligence Agency Panetta (2009–2011) Morell (2011) Petraeus (2011–2012) Morell (2012–2013) Brennan (2013–2017) Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs Jones (2009–2010) Donilon (2010–2013) Rice (2013–2017) Deputy Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs Donilon (2009–2010) McDonough (2010–2013) Blinken (2013–2015) Haines (2015–2017) Deputy National Security Advisor for Strategic Communications and Speechwriting Rhodes (2009–2017) Trade Representative Kirk (2009–2013) Marantis (2013) Sapiro (2013) Froman (2013–2017) Africa[edit] Tanzanian President Jakaya Kikwete was the first African Head of State to meet Obama During the 2008 campaign, Obama outlined his priorities for developing an Africa policy including taking action to stop "what U.S. officials have termed genocide in Darfur, fighting poverty, and expanding prosperity."[13] Some analysts believed that Obama's appointment of Susan Rice who was a former assistant secretary of state for African affairs, as U.S. ambassador to the United Nations was a sign that his administration would prioritize the continent.[13] Then Secretary of State-designate Hillary Clinton, in a January 13 hearing of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, said that the administration priorities would include "combating al-Qaida's efforts to seek safe havens in failed states in the Horn of Africa; helping African nations to conserve their natural resources and reap fair benefits from them; stopping war in Congo; [and] ending autocracy in Zimbabwe and human devastation in Darfur."[14] Darfur, Eastern Congo, Ghana and Zimbabwe have all played a significant role in the United States Africa policy. Some foreign policy analysts believed that conflicts in "Sudan, Somalia, and eastern Congo" would "eclipse any other policy plans."[13][dead link] President Obama visited Cairo, Egypt, where he addressed the "Muslim world" on June 4[15] and followed this trip with his first visit to sub-Saharan Africa, as President, on July 11, 2009 where he addressed Ghana's Parliament.[16] He was followed by Secretary of State Hillary Clinton who took a seven nation trip to Africa in August including stops in Angola, Cape Verde, Democratic Republic of the Congo, Kenya, Liberia, Nigeria and South Africa. Some foreign policy analysts have made the claim that this is "the earliest in any U.S. administration that both the president and the secretary of state have visited Africa." East Africa[edit] Piracy[edit] One of the first actions of the Obama administration was to sign a memorandum of understanding with Kenya to allow pirates captured off of Kenya's coast to be tried in Kenyan courts.[17][18] Somali pirates took Richard Phillips, a captain of an American cargo ship, hostage on April 8, 2009 during a failed attempt to take over the Maersk Alabama.[19] President Obama ordered the U.S. military to conduct a rescue mission to free Phillips who was held hostage by the pirates for five days. He was rescued on April 12, 2009 by United States Navy SEALs who killed three pirates and obtained the surrender of a fourth, Abduwali Muse.[20][21][22][23][24] The Obama administration's reaction and response to the kidnapping of Phillips had been commended as well as criticized, while others downplay his role in the rescue of Richard Phillips.[25][26][27] In 2014, Obama sought to increase operations in the Horn region in response to the Westgate mall attack in Kenya. A taskforce for the Horn peninsula had initiated drone strikes against pirates and al-Qaeda affiliates.[28] Somalia[edit] The Administration had been interested in propping up the Transitional National Government in Mogadishu. To this end, as well as to help cut down on terrorist activities and piracy in the region, the United States had deployed special operations forces, drones, air strikes and some military advisers to influence the ongoing Somali civil war and neutralize prominent Al-Shabaab members.[29][30][31][32] Zimbabwe[edit] Further information: Zimbabwe–United States relations Obama was a strong critic of the government of Zimbabwe led by President Robert Mugabe.[citation needed] Although Obama congratulated longtime opposition leader Morgan Tsvangirai on becoming Prime Minister of Zimbabwe under a power-sharing agreement, U.S. State Department spokesman Robert Wood warned, "We need to see evidence of good governance and particularly real, true power sharing on the part of Robert Mugabe before we are going to make any kind of commitment" to lifting economic sanctions on the impoverished Southern African country, which was ruled by Mugabe from independence in 1980 to 2017.[33] After the death of Susan Tsvangirai, the prime minister's wife, in an automobile collision in central Zimbabwe on March 6, 2009, the U.S. State Department expressed condolences to Tsvangirai, who also received minor injuries in the wreck.[34] Prime Minister Tsvangirai met with President Obama on June 12, 2009 at the White House.[35] Tsvangirai meets with Obama in the White House in June 2009 After Morgan Tsvangirai, Mugabe's rival and leader of the Movement for Democratic Change, became Prime Minister of Zimbabwe under a power-sharing agreement, the Obama administration extended its congratulations to Tsvangirai, but said that the U.S. would wait for evidence of Mugabe's cooperation with the MDC before it would consider lifting its sanctions.[33] In early March 2009, Obama proclaimed that US sanctions would be provisionally extended for another year, because Zimbabwe's political crisis as yet unresolved.[36] Middle Africa[edit] Democratic Republic of Congo[edit] The Obama administration's foreign policy in Africa was conducted primarily through the bureaucratic apparatus of the State Department, with both Secretaries of State Clinton and Kerry playing notable and well-publicized roles in African affairs.[37] In 2009, Secretary Clinton undertook a tour of seven African nations, including Angola, Cape Verde, Democratic Republic of Congo, Kenya, Liberia, Nigeria, and South Africa. During her visit to the DRC, Secretary Clinton met with rape survivors and later announced a $17 million plan for addressing sexual violence in the Democratic Republic of the Congo (DRC).[38] Throughout her tenure, Secretary Clinton has issued numerous statements addressing gender-based violence and other human rights abuses in the DRC on in accordance with her goal of improving the status of women and girls around the world. In 2013, then-Secretary of State John Kerry sought to draw greater attention to conflict and humanitarian crisis in DRC and surrounding countries, leading to the appointment of former Senator Russell Feingold to the position of Special Envoy to the Great Lakes Region.[39] Founder of the Eastern Congo Initiative Ben Affleck testified to Congress in 2014 that Feingold's collaboration with his U.N. counterpart and other international actors had begun to remedy a previously incoherent international response to humanitarian crisis in the DRC.[40] At Feingold's urging, the Obama administration invoked the Child Soldiers Prevention Act in order to place sanctions on Rwanda for their support of the March 23 militia (M23).[41] These actions were crucial in brokering the end of a brutally violent and destabilizing two-year campaign of insurgency by M23.[42] While the Obama administration received positive feedback for the invocation of the Child Soldiers Prevention Act against Rwanda, it was criticized for ignoring evidence that the Congolese government also made wide use of child soldiers.[43] The Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act[edit] The Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act was signed into law in 2010. Under Section 1502 of the Act, all corporations that use tantalum, tungsten, tin, and gold are mandated to trace these potential “conflict minerals” to their source and to publicly disclose if they originated in the DRC, with the objective being to discourage corporate activities that contribute to conflict in the DRC.[44] Intended to promote human rights and divert resources from continued fighting, the law has widely been criticized by American companies who cite the cost and difficulty of tracking and certifying materials as barriers to implementation. Critics also argue that Section 1502 misunderstands and misrepresents the role that minerals play in conflict, resulting in legislation that has produced no notable change in levels of conflict. Instead, a “de facto” embargo has ensued which has propelled between 5 and 12 million Congolese miners into unemployment and deeper poverty.[45] North Africa[edit] Egypt[edit] Obama speaking on "A New Beginning" at Cairo University on June 4, 2009 After escalating demonstrations challenged the long-standing strong-man rule of Egyptian President Hosni Mubarak, Obama and many European leaders called for him to step down and he did so in 2011. The Egyptians elected a new government based on the Muslim Brotherhood. However the new President Mohamed Morsi was overthrown in 2013 by the military. President Obama noted that the crisis in Egypt is deplorable and tragic; the situations at the end of 2013 remained very tense.[46] Libya[edit] After initial skepticism of international involvement to prevent Libyan leader Muammar Gaddafi from using violence to suppress popular demonstrations in his country,[47] the Obama administration crucially backed United Nations Security Council Resolution 1973 to create a Libyan no-fly zone, with United States Ambassador to the United Nations Susan Rice successfully pushing to include language allowing the UN mandate free rein to launch air attacks on Libyan ground targets threatening civilians.[48] In March 2011, Obama authorized the firing of 110 Tomahawk cruise missiles against targets in Libya, in response to regime actions against rebel forces, to enforce the UN no-fly zone.[49] West Africa[edit] Mali[edit] Under Obama, the U.S. government supported in Malian government in the Northern Mali conflict, aiding Mali in its fight against Tuareg rebels and their Islamist extremist allies, including Ansar Dine, which the U.S. designed as a foreign terrorist organization in 2013.[50] The U.S. provided counterterrorism, intelligence-sharing and other aid to the French military, which led an effort "to drive out insurgents and protect a civilian Malian government."[50] The U.S. also provided logistical support,[50] specifically by providing aerial refueling to the French Air Force.[50] The Obama administration had pledged not to put "boots on the ground" in Mali, but in April 2013, the U.S. Department of Defense disclosed that it had deployed 22 U.S. military personnel to the country.[51][52] Of these, ten were liaison support staff to French and African forces, while the others were assigned to the U.S. Embassy in Bamako; the U.S. troops did not engage in combat operations in Mali.[51] Arctic[edit] Further information: Arctic Policy of the United States During Obama's presidency, there was increased global attention paid to the Arctic, and the challenges and opportunities present in the region. The Obama administration responded accordingly by placing significantly greater focus on the Arctic and Arctic issues than the Bush administration, achieving a notable first in September 2015 by becoming the first sitting President ever to visit the Arctic Circle. The Arctic is divided between 8 Arctic states that serve as permanent members of the Arctic Council. The primary policy of the Obama administration within the region had been to facilitate cooperation among these states on regional issues.[53] Upon assuming office, Obama had looked to reset relations with Russia across the board; however, as US–Russian relations deteriorated in other matters of mutual interest, the Arctic remained a site of cooperation between the two states. In 2011, the Arctic states created the Arctic Search and Rescue Agreement, which established the search parameters for Arctic states. Search and Rescue collaboration between states has since strengthened further with the creation of the Coast Guard Forum in 2015. During Obama's presidency, the United States assumed chairmanship of the Arctic Council 2015-2017 and looked to launch major collaborative projects while in that office.[54] With the United States at the helm, the Arctic Council had focused on improving economic and living conditions for Arctic communities; improving Arctic Ocean safety, security and stewardship; and also addressing the impacts of climate change. The last Arctic Council meeting of Obama's Presidency was in Maine in 4–6 October 2016 where the agenda focused on Arctic sustainable development and the climate. Countering the regional effects of climate change had been a major focus of the Obama presidency's Arctic policy, particularly during his final two years in office. Obama agreed in March 2016 to protect at least 17% of its Arctic territory from development during a joint event with Prime Minister Trudeau of Canada. Within the Arctic Council, an expert group was created in 2015 investigating the threat posed by black carbon to the region which concluded its findings and recommendations in 2016. The administration had also looked to increase data sharing—a major agenda item at the inaugural White House Arctic Science Ministerial in September 2016.[55] While regional co-operation to counter joint challenges had been the primary commitment of the Obama administration, US Arctic military capabilities have also increased under Obama. In 2016, the ICEX exercise was carried out and was widely regarded to be a major success. President Obama had also commissioned two new US icebreakers in 2015. Asia[edit] Secretary of State Hillary Clinton announced in 2011 a rebalancing of foreign policy to give more emphasis to Asia, especially in response to the rapidly growing Chinese role in the region. She called for "a substantially increased investment – diplomatic, economic, strategic, and otherwise – in the Asia-Pacific region."[56] As of 2014, many analysts did not find significant changes and some argued that the U.S. is again neglecting the region.[57] Obama's support of the Trans-Pacific Partnership was motivated in large part by his goal to "pivot" the US to East Asia.[58] East Asia[edit] Further information: East Asian Foreign Policy of the Barack Obama administration President Barack Obama addresses the opening session of the first U.S.–China Strategic and Economic Dialogue. President Obama at the Vimean Santepheap (Peace Palace) in Phnom Penh, Cambodia. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton left on her first foreign policy tour (to Asia) on February 15, 2009 with stops in Japan, China, South Korea, Philippines, and Indonesia.[59] The Secretary had travelled to the region extensively, including at least three trips to various countries in the region in 2009, 2010 and 2011[60] In July 2012, Secretary Clinton traveled Mongolia, Vietnam, Laos and Cambodia.[61] The visit to Laos was the first by a Secretary of State in 57 years.[62] On April 1, 2009, Obama and Hu Jintao announced the establishment of the high-level U.S.-China Strategic and Economic Dialogue co-chaired by Hillary Clinton and Timothy Geithner on the U.S. side and Dai Bingguo and Wang Qishan on the Chinese side and on May 16, 2009 Obama personally announced the nomination of Jon Huntsman, Jr., the Republican Governor of Utah to fill the position of Ambassador to China. Huntsman was the only ambassador in the Administration to be personally announced by the President[63] times. Later that year, President Obama and Secretary Clinton made a high-profile trip to China on November 15–18, 2009 marking Obama's first visit to China. It was Obama's first presidential Asia trip since he was inducted. He also went to Japan, Singapore for the APEC summit and South Korea for the first U.S.-ASEAN summit. The United States Pacific Command had also been at the forefront of efforts to strengthen military relationships in the region.[64] The United States and China often clashed over China's claims in the South China Sea, parts of which are also claimed by Vietnam, the Philippines and Malaysia.[65] In 2014, President Obama stated that the United States recognized Tibet as part of China but also encouraged the Chinese authorities to take steps to preserve the unique cultural, religious and linguistic identity of the Tibetan people.[66] In 2016, Obama became the first sitting American president to visit Laos, which the United States had bombed during the Vietnam War.[67] Obama also increased funding to clean up unexploded ordnance in Laos.[67] United States President Barack Obama and Lee walking after a meeting at the Blue House in Seoul in November 2010. Hillary Clinton with Cambodian Foreign Minister Hor Namhong. North Korea[edit] North Korea is a major trouble area, especially regarding nuclear weapons and threats of military action.[68] Not long after Obama took office North Korea elbowed its way back onto the international stage after a period of relative quiet,[69] drawing accusations of planning a new long-range intercontinental ballistic missile test weeks after Obama was sworn in[70][71] and performing an unannounced nuclear warhead and missile testing in late May 2009 to the disapproval of the State Department.[72] Relations were further strained with the imprisonment of American journalists Euna Lee and Laura Ling for their alleged illegal entry into North Korean territory on assignment for a media organization.[73] although both women were later released on August 5, 2009.[74] Later that year, Pyongyang announced its intention to terminate the 1953 armistice ending hostilities in the Korean War on May 28, 2009 effectively restarting the nearly 60-year-old conflict, and prompting the South Korea-United States Combined Forces Command to Watchcon II, the second-highest alert level possible.[75] In 2010, two more major incidents with North Korea occurred: the sinking of a South Korean Navy Ship that actuated new rounds of military exercises with South Korea as a direct military response to sinking[76] and the Bombardment of Yeonpyeong prompting the US aircraft carrier USS George Washington to depart for joint exercises in the Yellow Sea with the Republic of Korea Navy, to deter further North Korean military action.[77][78] In light of the geopolitical developments with North Korea, the Obama Administration had called the U.S.–South Korean alliance as a "cornerstone of US security in the Pacific Region."[75] During Obama's presidency North Korea's nuclear-weapons and missile programme had become "steadily more alarming", with his failure to stifle it being described as "glaring."[79] Japan[edit] Japan, a major ally of the United States, has been engaged in a diplomatic dispute with China over control of the South China Sea. In then-Secretary of State Hillary Clinton's inaugural tour of East Asia, she reassured Japanese officials of Japan's centrality in the network of American alliances.[80] In response to the 2011 Tōhoku earthquake and tsunami, the United States initiated Operation Tomodachi to support Japan in disaster relief following the 2011 Tōhoku earthquake and tsunami[81] earning gratitude from Japan's minister of defense, Toshimi Kitazawa who, while visiting the Ronald Reagan, thanked its crew for its assistance as part of Operation Tomodachi saying, "I have never been more encouraged by and proud of the fact that the United States is our ally."[82] South Asia[edit] Further information: South Asian Foreign Policy of the Barack Obama administration Asif Ali Zardari, Barack Obama and Hamid Karzai during a US-Afghan-Pakistan trilateral meeting The Obama administrations's South Asian foreign policy was outlined in "The Obama Administration's Policy on South Asia" by Robert O. Blake, Jr., Assistant Secretary of State for the Bureau of South and Central Asian Affairs, who wrote "[o]ur goal was and remains to support the development of sovereign, stable, democratic nations, integrated into the world economy and cooperating with one another, the United States, and our partners to advance regional security and stability. At the start of the Obama administration there were several regional hot spots within South Asia including Afghanistan, India and Pakistan. Several conflicts exist within the region including an ongoing war in Afghanistan and an ongoing conflict in North-West Pakistan. President Obama with Indian Prime Minister Manmohan Singh during the first dinner hosted by the Obama administration. On February 18, 2009, Obama announced that the U.S. military presence in Afghanistan would be bolstered by 17,000 new troops by the summer.[83] Obama also ordered the expansion of airstrikes to include the organization of Baitullah Mehsud, the militant chief reportedly behind the 2007 assassination of Benazir Bhutto,[84] as priority targets.[85] The U.S. drone attacks in Pakistan, that were begun by President George W. Bush, have increased substantially[85] since an expansion of the attacks was authorized by President Barack Obama in 2009.[86] Drones have resulted in civilian casualties, and intentionally targeted rescuers, funerals, and one U.S. citizen.[87][88] UN reports have described the U.S. drone wars as extrajudicial killing[89] and summary executions.[90] There was also tension between India and Pakistan who had both come into possession of nuclear weapons. This conflict had been ongoing since August 1947 after the Partition of India. Criticism had been leveled at the Obama administration for its apparent lack of an early response to U.S. foreign policy with India. The former director for South Asia in the National Security Council in the Bush administration, Xenia Dormandy claims that India is America's indispensable ally in the region and that the Obama administration should take steps to improve relations with India.[91][92][93][94][95] West Asia[edit] Main article: Middle Eastern foreign policy of the Barack Obama administration Further information: Middle East and Israeli–Palestinian peace process President Barack Obama along with members of the national security team, receive an update on Operation Neptune's Spear, in the White House Situation Room, May 1, 2011. See also: The Situation Room War in Iraq[edit] During his campaign for the presidency, Barack Obama advocated a phased redeployment of troops out of Iraq within 16 months of being sworn in as president.[96] In order to accomplish this Obama stated that he would, based on the conditions on the ground, redeploy between one and two battalions a month.[97] Some of the forces returned to the U.S., while others were redeployed as part of a focus on the broader region including Afghanistan and Pakistan to confront terrorism.[98] Obama was in office for 3 years of the Iraq war. The U.S. gradually completed its withdrawal of military personnel in December 2011. In late February 2009, newly elected U.S. President Barack Obama announced an 18-month withdrawal window for combat forces, with approximately 50,000 soldiers remaining in the country. In November 2013 Obama met with Iraqi prime minister Nouri Maliki. He vowed a continuing partnership but said there would be no public aid, and urged to prime minister to be more inclusive, especially with regards to the Sunni population. Obama also encouraged wider political participation and passing an election law. They discussed how to curb a resurgent al-Qaeda and how to more thoroughly incorporate democracy in the country.[99] President Obama changed the timeline of withdrawing troops from Iraq within 16 months of his taking office as outlined in the election to 19 months after taking office. Obama appointed several Special Envoys including a Special Envoy for Middle East peace (George Mitchell) and a Special Envoy to Afghanistan and Pakistan (Richard C. Holbrooke). In 2013, Obama urged the leaders of the middle east to do more to stem or address the multiple locations where Sunni-Shia strife is occurring in the middle east, including in Bahrain, Syria and Iraq.[100] 2014 Intervention[edit] Main article: 2014 American intervention in Iraq In the wake of the shattering of the Iraqi military following 2014 Northern Iraq offensive Obama deployed thousands of American Marines, Special Forces troops and military advisers to shore up the remaining Iraqi forces.[101][102][103][104] These troops were also tasked with securing the area around the American Embassy in Baghdad as well as taking control of the International Airport. Obama said that the actions of these men would be "targeted and precise".[101] The administration also moved a carrier battle group in to the Persian Gulf. Americans have been flying extensive reconnaissance flights, both manned and unmanned.[102] American F-18 attack aircraft have also been spotted in the skies over Iraq since mid-summer.[101] In early August the Administration announced a wide-ranging air campaign in northern Iraq aimed at Sunni militants, while undertaking a significant humanitarian efforts aimed at Iraq's imperiled minorities.[105] Iran[edit] After the disputed June 2009 Iranian presidential election, Obama condemned the Iranian government's crackdown on the Iranian Green Movement opposition, a group of pro-democracy demonstrators.[106] Obama stated: "we respect Iranian sovereignty and want to avoid the United States being the issue inside of Iran, but "I am deeply troubled by the violence that I've been seeing on television. I think that the democratic process -- free speech, the ability of people to peacefully dissent -- all those are universal values and need to be respected."[107] After more violent was directed at protesters, Obama stated: "The United States and the international community have been appalled and outraged by the threats, beatings and imprisonments of the last few days" and issued a strong condemnation of "these unjust actions."[107] Some critics, including his 2012 presidential campaign rival Mitt Romney, faulted Obama, saying that he should have done more to support the Green Movement.[107][108][109][110][111] Others disagreed, noting that the Green Movement did not need or want direct foreign support, and arguing that direct U.S. backing for the Iranian opposition would likely "undermine its credibility, and perhaps even lend credence to the government’s assertion that the movement is a foreign-inspired plot that will rob Iran of its independence."[106] Obama signed the Comprehensive Iran Sanctions, Accountability, and Divestment Act of 2010 on July 1, 2010 to expand sanctions on Iran. The restrictions of the new law are so tight that third countries have warned about the interference with their trade.[112] However under Obama, Iran's oil exports have been halved.[113] After the election of centrist moderate Hassan Rouhani as President in 2013, Iran started a new stage of dialogue in its foreign relations in a bid to improve relations with the west. At Rouhani's official visit to New York City to attend the United Nations General Assembly, Obama requested a bilateral meeting with Rouhani, which didn't take place due to time restraints according to Rouhani. Rouhani stated that more time was needed to organise a proper meeting between the two countries' leaders due to the troubled past relationship of the two nations. On 27 September 2013, Iranian Foreign Minister Mohammad Javad Zarif and Secretary of State John Kerry held a one-on-one meeting, the first between the U.S. and Iran in a generation. The rare get-together was groundbreaking, according to Iranian analysts. One day later, Obama and Rouhani spoke with each other on the phone, the highest level of communication between the two nations leaders since the Iranian Revolution of 1979.[114] Israel[edit] Obama meeting with Israeli President Shimon Peres, May 2009 Relations between the U.S. and Israel have deteriorated considerably under the Barack Obama administration.[citation needed] While the overall alliance remains intact, antagonism between Barack Obama and current Israeli Prime Minister, Benjamin Netanyahu, had eroded bilateral ties between the two nations. Israel announced it was pushing ahead with building 1,600 new homes in a Jewish area in East Jerusalem in March 2010, as Vice-President Joe Biden was visiting. It was described as "one of the most serious rows between the two allies in recent decades".[115] Secretary of State Hillary Clinton said Israel's move was "deeply negative" for US-Israeli relations.[116] However Obama was the first United States president to supply Israel with modern bunker buster bombs.[117] And under Obama, United States Foreign Military Financing for Israel had increased to $3 billion for the first time in history.[118] Obama had pledged support for Israeli military superiority in the region and had described his allegiance with Israel as being "sacrosanct".[119] Under President Obama, the United States increased aid for Israel's Iron Dome.[120] On September 20, 2011, President Obama declared that the U.S. would veto a Palestinian application for statehood at the United Nations, asserting that "there can be no shortcut to peace".[121] Furthermore, in February, the administration had vetoed a U.N. resolution declaring Israeli settlements in the West Bank illegal.[122] In 2014 Obama said that only a two-state solution could ensure Israel's future as a Jewish-majority democracy.[123] Ehud Barak described Obama's support for Israel as being unparalleled and the most supportive in history, stating that Obama had done "more than anything that I can remember in the past" and that Obama's support is "extremely deep and profound".[124][125] On December 23, 2016, the United States, under the Obama Administration, abstained from United Nations Security Council Resolution 2334, effectively allowing it to pass.[126] On December 28, U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry strongly criticized Israel and its settlement policies in a speech.[127] Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu strongly criticized the Administration's actions,[128][129] and the Israeli government withdrew its annual dues from the organization, which totaled $6 million in United States dollars, on January 6, 2017.[130] On January 5, 2017, the United States House of Representatives voted 342-80 to condemn the UN Resolution.[131][132] Syria[edit] See also: Foreign involvement in the Syrian Civil War § United States President Obama meets with Russian President Vladimir Putin to discuss Syria and ISIL, September 29, 2015 In 2012, Obama, who had previously demanded the resignation of Syria's president Bashar al-Assad, said that the use of chemical weapons by the Assad government would be crossing a red line and would entail U.S. military action.[133] After reports on 21 August 2013 about the usage of chemical weapons in Syria, the Obama administration formally blamed the incident on the Syrian government and sought Congressional approval for military action in Syria. Besides, Obama sought support from Britain and France for an attack in Syria.[134] The Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel approved plans for a barrage of Tomahawk cruise missile strikes to have those called off by Obama in September.[135] On 11 September 2013, Obama put a military strike or combat operations on hold and achieved an agreement with Russia and the Syrian government to destroy all chemical weapons in Syria.[136] Obama's decision to allow the violation of a red line he himself had drawn to go unpunished is widely criticised by the U.S. political establishment, as well as the allies,[137] as detrimental to America's international credibility.[133] However, in early 2016, Obama said he was "proud" of his decision, which repudiated what he referred to as the "Washington playbook" and avoided entangling the US in yet another "unfixable" situation in the Middle East.[133][138] More broadly, regarding Obama's lack of meaningful support to the Syrian anti-government rebels, in 2015, The Economist opined, "Rarely has an American president so abjectly abandoned his global responsibility",[139] adding in 2016, "The agony of Syria is the biggest moral stain on Barack Obama's presidency. And the chaos rippling from Syria—where many now turn to al-Qaeda, not the West, for salvation—is his greatest geopolitical failure."[140] In 2016, Nicholas Kristof described inaction in Syria as "Obama's worst mistake",[141] while Jonathan Schanzer said "the White House Syria policy has been an unmitigated dumpster fire."[142] Michael Mullen, former chairman of the joint chiefs of staff, described the conflict in Syria as "Obama's Rwanda".[143] This is in lieu of the CIA-backed operation Timber Sycamore, which provide weapons and trainings to anti-government rebels, but proved to be ineffective by the end of the Obama presidency. In comments published on 1 December 2016, about the U.S. becoming increasingly sidelined by Moscow and Ankara, Emile Hokayem of the International Institute for Strategic Studies, blamed the marginalisation of the U.S. in the Syrian Civil War and the region at large on Barack Obama, "The American approach to this conflict guaranteed the US less and less relevance, not just in the Syrian conflict but also the broader regional dynamics. There has been a loss of face and a loss of leverage. The politics of the region are being transformed and this happened under Obama, whether by design or by failure."[144] In 2017, as Russia on the back of its successful military campaign in Syria forged closer ties with Turkey and Saudi Arabia, analysts and politicians in the Middle East concurred that Russia's clout in the region had grown “because Obama allowed it to’’ by failing to intervene robustly in Syria.[145] The "Red Line" ultimatum[edit] The Obama "Red Line" remark was intended as an ultimatum to the Syrian president and the Syrian army to cease the use of chemical weapons. It appeared in a Presidential statement on 20 August 2012. Obama's red line was enforced by means of threat of massive military force in September 2013 and resulted in the substantial destruction of the Syrian stockpile of chemical weapons by June 2014. Obama stated, "We have been very clear to the Assad regime, but also to other players on the ground, that a red line for us is we start seeing a whole bunch of chemical weapons moving around or being utilized. That would change my calculus. That would change my equation."[146] One year later, in the early hours of 21 August 2013, two opposition-controlled areas in the suburbs around Damascus, Syria were struck by rockets containing the chemical agent sarin. The attack was the deadliest use of chemical weapons since the Iran–Iraq War.[147] A U.S.-led military attack to punish Syria for using chemical weapons was anticipated by the end of August 2013 in which American forces and their allies launched more than 100 missiles into Syria.[148] The U.S. Navy brought four destroyers into position in the eastern Mediterranean to reach targets inside Syria. The USS Nimitz carrier group was rerouted to Syria in early September 2013.[149] Russia and Great Britain among other nations began evacuating their citizens in anticipation of the bombardment.[150] During the G20 summit on 6 September, Vladimir Putin and Obama discussed the idea of putting Syria's chemical weapons under international control. On 9 September 2013, Kerry stated in response to a question from a journalist that the air strikes could be averted if Syria turned over "every single bit" of its chemical weapons stockpiles within a week, but Syria "isn't about to do it and it can't be done." State Department officials stressed that Kerry's statement and its one-week deadline were rhetorical in light of the unlikelihood of Syria turning over its chemical weapons. Hours after Kerry's statement, Russian foreign minister Sergey Lavrov announced that Russia had suggested to Syria that it relinquish its chemical weapons, and Syrian foreign minister Walid al-Moallem immediately welcomed the proposal.[151] U.S.–Russian negotiations led to the 14 September 2013 "Framework for Elimination of Syrian Chemical Weapons," which called for the elimination of Syria's chemical weapon stockpiles by mid-2014. Following the agreement, Syria acceded to the Chemical Weapons Convention and agreed to apply that convention provisionally until its entry into force on 14 October 2013. On 21 September, Syria ostensibly provided an inventory of its chemical weapons to the Organisation for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons (OPCW), before the deadline set by the framework. The destruction of Syria's chemical weapons began on the basis of international agreements with Syria that stipulated an initial destruction deadline of 30 June 2014. UN Security Council Resolution 2118 of 27 September 2013 required Syria to assume responsibility for and follow a timeline for the destruction of its chemical weapons and its chemical weapon production facilities. The Security Council resolution bound Syria to the implementation plan presented in a decision of the OPCW. On 23 June 2014, the last declared chemical weapons left Syria. The destruction of the most dangerous chemical weapons was performed at sea aboard the Cape Ray, a vessel of the United States Maritime Administration's Ready Reserve Force, crewed with US civilian merchant mariners. The actual destruction operations, performed by a team of U.S. Army civilians and contractors, destroyed 600 metric tons of chemical agents in 42 days. Bahrain protests[edit] Some in the media questioned Obama's decision to welcome Bahrain in Prince Salman bin Hamad al-Khalifa in June 2011 because of the fierce crackdown on protesters in the country. The collaboration of Saudi Arabia and the other Gulf states with Bahrains royalty, had carried out mass repression since the middle of March. This included detaining, beating and torture of thousands.[152] In June 2013, Obama urged meaningful reform in Bahrain.[153] Bahraini officials rejected Obama's claims about sectarianism between Sunnis and Shias.[100] Nevertheless, the Obama administration resumed providing arms and maintenance to the regime during its crackdown on pro-democracy groups, including ammunition, combat vehicle parts, communications equipment, Blackhawk helicopters, and an unidentified missile system.[154][155] Accordingly, the administration's larger policy on dealing with the "Arab Spring" is to continue propping up longtime client regimes while fostering "regime alteration."[156] Saudi Arabia[edit] The United States and Saudi Arabia continued their post-war alliance during the Obama presidency, and the Obama Administration supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen during the Yemeni Civil War.[157] However, tensions between the Saudis and the United States arose following the Iranian nuclear deal, as Saudi Arabia and Iran have strained relations and have competed for influence in the Middle East.[157] The Obama administration attempted to defuse tensions between the two countries, as it hoped for cooperation with both countries in regards to the Syrian Civil War and military operations against ISIS.[158] Obama also criticized the human rights record of Saudi Arabia, particularly in regards to the imprisonment of Raif Badawi.[159] When once asked whether Saudi Arabia was America's friend, Obama replied with "It's complicated."[160][161] According to The Economist, opining in April 2016, thanks in large part to Obama, America's relationship with Saudi Arabia had become "deeply strained" under his tenure.[162] Despite fierce opposition on the part of the Saudi government,[163][164] the U.S. Congress passed and then overrode Obama's veto of the Justice Against Sponsors of Terrorism Act. Europe[edit] President Barack Obama talks with Prime Minister Arseniy Yatsenyuk of Ukraine at the conclusion of their bilateral meeting in the Oval Office, March 12, 2014. Main article: European foreign policy of the Barack Obama administration Fabbrini in 2011 identified a cycle in anti-Americanism in Europe: modest in the 1990s, it grew explosively between 2003–2008, then declined after 2008. He sees the current version as related to images of American foreign policy-making as unrestrained by international institutions or world opinion. Thus it is the unilateral policy process and the arrogance of policy makers, not the specific policy decisions, that are decisive.[165] East Europe[edit] Russia[edit] See also: Russia–United States relations § Obama's tenure (2009–2017), and Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections Tensions remained as Russia pushed back against attempts at further eastward expansion of NATO and the European Union into areas that had previously been part of the Russian Empire and the USSR. Georgia and Ukraine were the major flash points. Early on, Obama called for a "reset" of relations with Russia, and in 2009 the policy became known as the Russian reset; but critics debated whether or not it could improve bilateral relations or was about to concede too much to Russia.[166] At the end of March 2014, president Obama dismissed Russia as a "regional power" that did not pose a major security threat to the U.S.[167] The statement was later sharply criticised by Putin as "disrespectful" and an attempt to prove America's exceptionalism[168][169] as well as by the president of the European Commission Jean-Claude Juncker who in November 2016 said, "We have a lot to learn about the depths of Russia, we are very ignorant about it at the moment. ... Russia is not, as President Obama said, 'a regional power'. This was a big error in assessment."[170] After Russia's military intervention in Syria in 2015 and the alleged interference[171] in the 2016 election campaign in the U.S., relations between the Russian government and Obama administration became more strained. In September 2016, the U.S. government publicly accused Russia of "flagrant violations of international law" in Syria.[172] Thomas Friedman opined, "Obama believed that a combination of pressure and engagement would moderate Putin's behavior. That is the right approach, in theory, but it's now clear that we have underestimated the pressure needed to produce effective engagement, and we're going to have to step it up. This is not just about the politics of Syria and Ukraine anymore. It's now also about America, Europe, basic civilized norms and the integrity of our democratic institutions."[173] George Robertson, a former UK defense secretary and NATO secretary-general, said that Obama had "allowed Putin to jump back on the world stage and test the resolve of the West", adding that the legacy of this disaster would last.[137] In mid-November 2016, the Kremlin accused president Obama's administration of trying to damage the U.S.' relationship with Russia to a degree that would render normalisation thereof impossible for the incoming administration of Donald Trump.[174] In December 2017, Mike Rogers, who was Chairman of the House of Representatives' Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence in 2011–2015, said that Obama and his inner circle had a habit of rejecting the idea that Russia under Putin was a resurgent and perilous adversary; and this dismissiveness on Russia "filter[ed] its way down".[175] Ukraine[edit] Main article: 2014 pro-Russian unrest in Ukraine In the wake of the Euromaidan protests the Obama administration had embraced the new government of Prime Minister Arseniy Yatsenyuk. After Russia began to occupy the Crimean peninsula Obama warned Russia of "severe consequences" if Russia annexes the region and attempted to negotiate a withdraw of Russian troops. To date, all negotiations have been unsuccessful.[176] On December 18, 2014 Obama signed into law Ukraine Freedom Support Act of 2014.[177] North America[edit] Canada[edit] See also: Canada – United States relations Prime Minister Justin Trudeau (left) and President Barack Obama (right) meet in Washington in March 2016 After Obama's presidential election victory in 2008, it was announced that Mr. Obama's first international trip would be to Canada, which took place on February 19, 2009.[178] Aside from Canadian lobbying against "Buy American" provisions in the US stimulus package, relations between the two administrations had been smooth up to 2011. On February 4, 2011, Harper and Obama issued a "Declaration on a Shared Vision for Perimeter Security and Economic Competitiveness".[179][180] Prime Minister Justin Trudeau, who was elected in October 2015, visited the White House for an official visit and state dinner on March 10, 2016.[181] Trudeau and Obama were reported to have shared warm personal relations during the visit, making humorous remarks about which country was better at hockey and which country had better beer.[182] Obama complimented Trudeau's 2015 election campaign for its "message of hope and change" and "positive and optimistic vision". Obama and Trudeau also held "productive" discussions on climate change and relations between the two countries, and Trudeau invited Obama to speak in the Canadian parliament in Ottawa later in the year.[183] Cuba[edit] See also: United States embargo against Cuba Further information: Cuba–United States relations and Cuban Thaw Meeting between President Obama and Cuban President Raúl Castro in Panama, April 2015 During his presidential campaign in 2008, Obama asserted that his policy toward Cuba would be based on "libertad", promising that as President of the United States, he would push the Cuban government to embrace democratic reforms and free political prisoners.[184] After his election, former Cuban President Fidel Castro said he was "open" to the idea of meeting with the president-elect.[185] However most of his policies towards Cuba before 2014 were little changed from the Bush policies.[186] After Obama announced the intended closure of the Guantánamo Bay detention camp shortly after his inauguration, Cuban President Raúl Castro said Havana would continue to push for the U.S. to "liquidate" the entire Guantanamo Bay Naval Base and return the land to Cuba.[187] He was joined by his brother Fidel, who abandoned his magnanimity toward the new U.S. president and demanded that the base be retroceded to Cuba.[188] While the United States House of Representatives passed legislation, backed by Obama, to ease certain travel and cash transactions imposed against Cuba by the U.S., on February 25, 2009, sanctions which were further eased by Obama unilaterally in April 2009,[189] the president was initially coy about lifting the embargo against Cuba.[190] Obama professed to view the embargo as a useful tool for leverage on pushing for reform in Cuba.[191] This is in contrast to what Obama stated in 2004 when he said that it was time "to end the embargo with Cuba" because it had "utterly failed in the effort to overthrow Castro."[192] Obama's stance had met criticism from both Fidel Castro[193] and members of the U.S. government, including ranking member of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee Richard Lugar.[194] A panel with the Washington-based Brookings Institution released a report in late February 2009 urging Obama to normalize relations with Cuba.[195] On June 2, leading a delegation to Honduras for the Organization of American States General Assembly, Clinton affirmed that Cuba needed to reach a certain political and democratic standard to rejoin the organization.[196] On 10 December 2013, Obama shook hands with Raul Castro at the state funeral of Nelson Mandela.[197] In December 2014, after the secret meetings, it was announced that Obama, with Pope Francis as an intermediary, had negotiated a restoration of relations with Cuba, more than a half-century after diplomatic ties were broken in 1961.[198] Popularly dubbed the Cuban Thaw, The New Republic deemed the Cuban Thaw to be "Obama's finest foreign policy achievement."[199] On July 1, 2015, Obama announced that formal diplomatic relations between Cuba and the United States would resume, and embassies would be opened in Washington and Havana.[200] The countries' respective "interests sections" in one another's capitals were upgraded to embassies on July 20 and August 13, 2015, respectively.[201] Obama visited Havana, Cuba for two days in March 2016, becoming the first sitting U.S. President to arrive since Calvin Coolidge in 1928.[202] Honduras[edit] Further information: 2009 Honduran coup d'état Further information: United States–Honduras relations On June 28, 2009, President Manuel Zelaya was arrested and exiled from the country. Obama condemned the action and described the event as a coup. On July 7, Secretary of State Hillary Clinton met with Zelaya and agreed upon a U.S.-backed proposal for negotiations with the Micheletti government, mediated by President Óscar Arias of Costa Rica.[203] At the conclusion of the meeting, Clinton announced the suspension of economic and military aid to the Honduran government.[204] However, the U.S. led a group of Western Hempishere countries supporting the outcome of November 2009 presidential election of Porfirio Lobo as a way forward to resolve the situation.[205] Oceania[edit] New Zealand[edit] Further information: New Zealand–United States relations The Obama administration continued to develop closer relations with New Zealand, particularly in the area of defense and intelligence cooperation. Relations with the National government led by Prime Minister John Key have been smooth and friendly. This process had already begun under the previous George W. Bush administration in 2007, which culminated in a state visit by the-then Labour Prime Minister Helen Clark to the United States in July 2008. While the United States and New Zealand had been close allies since World War II and were members of the tripartite ANZUS security alliance with Australia, US-NZ bilateral relations had deteriorated under the Ronald Reagan Administration in February 1985 due to New Zealand's anti-nuclear policy which banned visits by nuclear-capable or nuclear-powered warships.[206] As a result, no bilateral military exercises had taken place until April 2012 and New Zealand warships were barred from visiting US ports and participating in joint naval exercises until May 2013.[207][208] On 4 November 2010, Secretary of State Hillary Clinton and her New Zealand counterpart Minister of Foreign Affairs Murray McCully signed the Wellington Declaration which committed the two countries to a closer bilateral relationship with an increased emphasis on strategic partnership. This strategic partnership had two fundamental elements: "a new focus on practical cooperation in the Pacific region; and enhanced political and subject-matter dialogue—including regular Foreign Ministers' meetings and political-military discussions."[209] The agreement also stressed the continued need for New Zealand and the United States to work together on global issues like nuclear proliferation, climate change and terrorism.[209] Following the 2011 Christchurch earthquake, President Obama expressed his condolences to Prime Minister Key. The US government also contributed $1 million in relief funds while the United States Agency for International Development (USAID) and the Los Angeles County Fire Department contributed rescue teams.[206] On 23 July 2011, Prime Minister John Key also visited President Obama at the White House.[210] The John Key National government also continued to contribute military forces to support the US-led War in Afghanistan, including the elite New Zealand Special Air Service. The previous Labour government had also contributed military forces to Afghanistan since October 2001.[206] In April 2013, the last remaining NZ troops withdrew from Afghanistan.[211] On 19 June 2012, Secretary of Defense Leon Panetta and his New Zealand counterpart Minister of Defence Jonathan Coleman signed the Washington Declaration which committed the US and New Zealand to a closer defense cooperation arrangement.[212] It sought to restore defense cooperation between the two countries which had been curtailed by the ANZUS Split. Two key areas of this Declaration included the resumption of regular senior-level dialogues between the US Department of Defense and the New Zealand Ministry of Defence and the New Zealand Defence Force; and security cooperation.[213] As a result of the Washington Declaration, New Zealand warships were allowed to visit US ports even though New Zealand's anti-nuclear policy remained intact.[208] The Washington Declaration was also part of the Obama administration's pivot into the Asia-Pacific to counter the emerging influence of China.[214] South America[edit] Argentina[edit] See also: Argentina–United States relations President Obama meets with Argentine President Mauricio Macri in Buenos Aires, March 23, 2016 President Obama made a state visit to Argentina on March 23–24, 2016 to improve the Argentina–United States relations under the administration of newly elected Argentine president, Mauricio Macri. This followed strained relations under predecessors Cristina Fernández de Kirchner and Néstor Kirchner regarding investments.[215] Obama and Macri discussed ways to strengthen cooperation in promoting "universal values and interests," such as in the areas of security, energy, health and human rights, where the two presidents have agreed for American help to assist Argentina's counter-terrorism efforts, to contribute to peacekeeping missions, combat illegal drug trade and organized crime, respond to diseases and outbreaks like the Zika virus, and develop resources and renewable energy strategies.[216] Obama declared a "fresh era" of relations to help Argentina's credibility in the Latin American region and the world, and announced trade and economic initiatives to reset the countries' relations after years of tension.[217] Colombia[edit] See also: Colombia – United States relations Obama continued Plan Colombia, a diplomatic aid initiative launched by President Bill Clinton to aid Colombia's economy. Partially as a result of Plan Colombia, Colombian President Juan Manuel Santos negotiated an agreement with the guerrilla organization FARC.[218] Though Colombia remained a major producer of drugs, it saw remarkable progress in the reduction of kidnappings, homicides, and unemployment.[218] In addition to continuing Plan Colombia, Obama appointed Bernard Aronson as a special envoy to the peace process between the Colombian government and FARC in order to facilitate negotiations.[218] However, Congresswoman Ileana Ros-Lehtinen and others criticized Obama for engaging with FARC, an organization that appears on the State Department's list of terrorist organizations.[218] Obama promised a continuation of its policy of financial aid to Colombia in the aftermath of the proposed peace deal.[219] Venezuela[edit] Further information: United States–Venezuela relations The Obama administration approved $5 million annual budget for backing opposition activities against the Venezuelan government.[220] While Obama set a conciliatory tone for his relations with Venezuela during his candidacy, saying he would be willing to meet with Venezuelan President Hugo Chávez without preconditions at a July 23, 2007, presidential debate,[221] the Venezuelan leader had been fickle in his opinion of Obama. Even during the election he varied from liking Obama to saying that nothing would change with the US. In January 2009 Chávez derided Obama as taking the same stance toward Venezuela as Bush, but the next month, as the price of oil fell, Chavez communicated openness to discussions with the Obama administration.[222] On February 15, 2009, Chávez said, "Any day is propitious for talking with President Barack Obama,"[223] but said later that month that he "couldn't care less" about meeting the new U.S. president[224] ahead of an impending confrontation between the two leaders at the Summit of the Americas in Port-of-Spain, Trinidad, in mid-April.[225] However, as recently as the first week of March, Chávez called upon Obama to follow the path to socialism, which he termed as the "only" way out of the global recession. "Come with us, align yourself, come with us on the road to socialism. This is the only path. Imagine a socialist revolution in the United States", Chávez told a group of workers in the southern Venezuelan state of Bolívar. He said that people were calling Obama a "socialist" for the measures of state intervention he is taking to counter the crisis, so it would not be too far-fetched to suggest that he might join the project of "21st century socialism" that the Venezuelan leader is heading. Later in March he referred to Obama as a "poor ignoramus" for not knowing the situation in Latin America and even implied that Brazil's President Lula was not completely happy with his meeting with Obama. However the Brazilian Foreign Ministry denied that this was the case.[226] In Tokyo in early April, where he attended meetings to discuss trade deals with the Japanese, Chávez said he was not biased against the Obama administration and he fully supported the idea of a 21st-century free from conflict. In Trinidad on April 17, 2009, Obama and Chávez met for the first time, with the former asking in Spanish, "Come estás?" Later, Chávez walked over to Obama during the summit, and handed him a copy of The Open Veins of Latin America: Five Centuries of the Pillage of a Continent by Uruguayan author Eduardo Galeano, an essay about U.S. and European economic and political interference in the region. During the summit, Obama is reported to have said, to much applause, "We have at times been disengaged, and at times we sought to dictate our terms, but I pledge to you that we seek an equal partnership. There is no senior partner and junior partner in our relations".[citation needed] Other issues[edit] NSA spying scandal[edit] See also: Global surveillance disclosures (2013–present) In early 2013 Edward Snowden leaked to the media a trove of documents on the Obama administration's controversial mass surveillance campaign. These revelations have strained relationships between Obama and the foreign leaders that his administration is spying on.[227][228][229][230] Fears of American spy software have also cost several American companies contracts for export work.[231][232][233] Muslim relations[edit] See also: A New Beginning On January 26, 2009, Obama gave his first formal interview as president to the Arabic-language television news channel Al Arabiya.[234][235] Obama said that, "My job to the Muslim world is to communicate that the Americans are not your enemy."[234] Obama mentioned that he had spent several years growing up in the world's most populous Muslim nation, Indonesia, and called for resumed negotiations between Israel and Palestinians.[234] Obama's gesture in reaching out to the Muslim world was unprecedented for a U.S. president.[235] President Obama's first trip to a Muslim majority country occurred on April 6–7, 2009 when he visited Turkey and spoke to the Grand National Assembly.[236] President Obama addressed the Muslim world in a speech in Cairo, Egypt on June 4, 2009.[15] In that speech President Obama issued a call for "a new beginning" in the relationship between the United States and Muslims around the world. He outlined his ideas about "engaging the Muslim world" and how to create "a new beginning." Farah Pandith was appointed as the State Department's "first ever Special Representative to Muslim Communities" and was sworn in on September 15, 2009.[237] She describes her responsibilities as including actively listening and responding to "the concerns of Muslims in Europe, Africa, and Asia."[237] Missile defense[edit] In 2012 Obama promised more flexibility on missile defense after his reelection,[238] this flexibility was demonstrated the next year when Kerry offered to reduce American defenses against Chinese missiles.[239] See also[edit] Yemen model Hillary Clinton's tenure as Secretary of State List of presidential trips made by Barack Obama Global war on terrorism Duty: Memoirs of a Secretary at War, by Robert M. Gates Bowe Bergdahl, U.S. soldier released in 2014 in exchange for the "Taliban Five". References[edit] ^ Tilghman, Andrew (26 December 2016). "New in 2017: Big decisions for the wars in Iraq, Syria and Afghanistan". Military Times. Retrieved 2 January 2017. ^ Savage, Charlie (19 January 2017). "Obama Transfers 4 From Guantánamo, Leaving 41 There as Term Ends". New York Times. Retrieved 20 January 2017. ^ Madison, Lucy (June 19, 2013). "Obama Defends 'Narrow' Surveillance Programs". CBS News. Retrieved June 30, 2013. ^ Clinton, Hillary (January 13, 2009). "Nomination Hearing To Be Secretary of State". State Department. Archived from the original on January 24, 2009. Retrieved 2009-01-13. ^ "Obama's inaugural address full text and video". White House. January 20, 2009. Retrieved 2017-02-05. ^ "Obama urges Israel to open Gaza borders". Retrieved 2009-01-22. ^ "President Obama Delivers Remarks to State Department Employees". The Washington Post. January 22, 2009. Retrieved 2009-01-23. ^ Smith, Ben (January 22, 2009). "U.S. foreign policy: Who's in charge?". The Politico. Retrieved 2009-02-08. ^ a b Landler, Mark (January 27, 2009). "Clinton Sees an Opportunity for Iran to Return to Diplomacy". The New York Times. Retrieved 2009-01-28. ^ "Hillary Clinton leaves quick stamp on US State Department". Agence France-Presse. January 27, 2009. Archived from the original on January 31, 2009. Retrieved 2009-02-08. ^ Thomma, Steven (January 13, 2009). "Obama's No. 1 – most foreign travel by first year president". McClatchy Newspapers. Archived from the original on 2009-10-15. Retrieved 2009-10-07. ^ Al Kamen (October 23, 2009). "In the Loop:Donors and cronies still get the choice postings". Washington Post. pp. 24A. ^ a b c "Imagining Obama's Africa Policy". Council on Foreign Relations. December 22, 2008. Archived from the original on March 2, 2009. Retrieved September 16, 2009. ^ "Hillary Clinton Outlines Obama's Africa Policy". allAfrica.com. January 24, 2009. ^ a b "Text: Obama's Speech in Cairo". New York Times. June 4, 2009. Retrieved May 2, 2010. ^ Sabloff, Nick (July 11, 2009). "Obama Ghana Speech: FULL TEXT". Huffington Post. ^ "Kenya, US Agree to Deal on Piracy". VOA News. January 27, 2009. Archived from the original on September 18, 2012. ^ "Kenya Accepts Seven Alleged Pirates from U.S. Navy for Trial". March 5, 2009. Archived from the original on September 13, 2009. Retrieved September 16, 2009. ^ Sanders, Edmund; Barnes, Julian E. (April 9, 2009). "Somalia pirates hold U.S. captain". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved September 16, 2009. ^ "Official: US sea captain faced imminent danger". Associated Press. April 12, 2009. Archived from the original on April 15, 2009. Retrieved September 16, 2009. ^ Mikkelsen, Randall (April 12, 2009). "US acted after pirates aimed at ship captain". Reuters. Archived from the original on April 15, 2009. Retrieved September 16, 2009. ^ "US captain rescued from pirates". BBC News. April 13, 2009. Retrieved September 16, 2009. ^ Verjee, Zain; Starr, Barbara (April 12, 2009). "Captain jumps overboard, SEALs shoot pirates, official says". CNN. Retrieved September 16, 2009. ^ "US captain held by pirates freed". BBC News. April 12, 2009. Retrieved September 16, 2009. ^ "Blood in the Water". Newsweek. April 15, 2009. ^ "President Obama Ordered the Killing of Three Black Muslim Kids". The Rush Limbaugh Show. April 14, 2009. Archived from the original on November 6, 2009. Retrieved September 16, 2009. ^ "Why Obama's Action Against the Somali Pirates Matters". U.S. News & World Report. April 23, 2009. Archived from the original on April 27, 2009. ^ "US military steps up operations in the Horn of Africa". BBC News. February 7, 2014. ^ Cloud, David S. (January 10, 2014). "U.S. military secretly sent small team of advisors to Somalia". Los Angeles Times. ^ Whitlock, Craig (January 11, 2014). "National Security". The Washington Post. ^ "US forces launch missile strike against Al Shabaab leader in Somalia". The Daily Telegraph. London. January 27, 2014. ^ "US deploys small military team to Somalia". NBC News. January 10, 2014. Retrieved 2016-10-12. ^ a b "Obama congratulates Tsvangirai". NewsToday.co.za. February 13, 2009. Archived from the original on August 6, 2009. ^ "MDC to examine Tsvangirai crash". BBC News. March 7, 2009. ^ "Remarks by President Obama and Prime Minister Tsvangirai of Zimbabwe after meeting, 6-12-09". obamawhitehouse.archives.gov. 2009-06-12. Retrieved 2017-02-05. ^ "Obama extends sanctions against Mugabe regime". AFP via France 24. February 3, 2010. Retrieved February 13, 2012. ^ Bangura, Abdul Karim, (editor.); ProQuest (Firm) (2015), Assessing Barack Obama's Africa policy : suggestions for him and African leaders, University Press of America, Inc, ISBN 978-0-7618-6411-0 ^ Gettleman, Jeffrey. "Clinton Presents Plan to Fight Sexual Violence in Congo". Retrieved 2018-11-14. ^ "Ex-Senator Feingold Chosen as Special Envoy to African Region". Retrieved 2018-11-14. ^ Peace Prospects in the African Great Lakes Region, 113th Cong. (2014) (testimony of Ben Affleck). ^ Smith, David (2013-10-04). "US blocks military aid to Rwanda over alleged backing of M23 child soldiers". the Guardian. Retrieved 2018-11-14. ^ Abramowitz, David (2015-05-14). "A 'waning of US leadership' in Africa's Great Lakes region". TheHill. Retrieved 2018-11-14. ^ "President Obama Fails Child Soldiers". Human Rights Watch. 2016-09-29. Retrieved 2018-11-14. ^ United States. Congress. House. Committee on Financial Services. Subcommittee on International Monetary Policy and Trade. (2013). The costs and consequences of Dodd-Frank section 1502 : Impacts on America and the Congo : Hearing before the subcommittee on international monetary policy and trade of the committee on financial services, U.S. house of representatives, one hundred twelfth congress, second session, may 10, 2012. Washington: U.S. G.P.O. (2013). Retrieved November 14, 2018, from ProQuest Congressional. ^ Wolfe, Lauren. "How Dodd-Frank Is Failing Congo". Foreign Policy. Retrieved 2018-11-14. ^ "Tragedy and Nonsense". Huffington Post. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "U.S. Ambassador to NATO: No-fly zone wouldn't help much". Foreign Policy. March 7, 2011. Retrieved March 18, 2011. ^ Evans, Michael; Coghlan, Tom (March 18, 2011). "US plans for military action in Libya". The Australian. Retrieved March 18, 2011. ^ Ian Pannell (2011-03-21). "Libya: US 'to reduce role in military campaign'". BBC News. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ a b c d Karen DeYoung, United States designates Ansar Dine a foreign terrorist organization, Washington Post (March 21, 2013). ^ a b Whitlock, Craig (May 1, 2013). "Pentagon deploys small number of troops to war-torn Mali". The Washington Post. ^ Bernton, Hal (2013-03-19). "U.S. Steps Up Support for French in Mali". Military.com. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "What is Obama's Arctic Legacy?". Polar Research and Policy Initiative. August 25, 2016. Retrieved November 18, 2016. ^ "U.S. Chairmanship of the Arctic Council". state.gov. Retrieved 20 January 2017. ^ "A Tale of Friendship and Legacy: Bilateral North American Polar Protection". Polar Research and Policy Initiative. November 16, 2016. Retrieved November 18, 2016. ^ Hillary Clinton, "America's Pacific Century: The future of politics will be decided in Asia, not Afghanistan or Iraq, and the United States will be right at the center of the action," Foreign Policy (Nov 2011) online ^ Euan Graham, "Southeast Asia in the US Rebalance: Perceptions from a Divided Region," Contemporary Southeast Asia: A Journal of International and Strategic Affairs (Dec 2013) 35#3 pp 305-332, online. ^ Cartillier, Jerome (5 October 2015). "With free trade deal, Obama solidifies US pivot to Asia". Yahoo. Retrieved 24 April 2016. ^ Kessler, Glenn (February 15, 2009). "China Is at the Heart of Clinton's First Trip". The Washington Post. Retrieved 2009-02-16. ^ "We're sorry, that page can't be found". State.gov. 2016-10-13. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "Secretary Clinton: Travel to France, Afghanistan, Japan, Mongolia, Vietnam, Laos, Cambodia, Egypt, and Israel". State Department. July 5–17, 2012. Archived from the original on September 21, 2012. Retrieved 2012-09-29. ^ Jane Perlez (2012-07-11). "Vietnam War's Legacy Is Vivid as Clinton Visits Laos". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Superville, Darlene (May 16, 2009). "Utah GOP governor is Obama's pick as China envoy". Associated Press. Archived from the original on July 10, 2012. ^ Sutter, Robert (January 2010). "Sun to Set on US Role in APAC?". The Diplomat. Retrieved 2012-09-29. ^ Perlez, Jane (29 March 2016). "Obama Faces a Tough Balancing Act Over South China Sea". New York Times. Retrieved 24 April 2016. ^ "Remarks by President Obama and President Xi Jinping in Joint Press Conference". obamawhitehouse.archives.gov. 2014-11-12. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ a b Landler, Mark (6 September 2016). "Obama Acknowledges Scars of America's Shadow War in Laos". New York Times. Retrieved 6 September 2016. ^ Delury, John (April–June 2013). "The Disappointments of Disengagement: Assessing Obama's North Korea Policy". Asian Perspective. 37 (2). Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Feffer, John (February 17, 2009). "North Korea to Obama: Don't Ignore Us!". The Progressive. ^ Solomon, Jay; Siobhan Gorman (February 3, 2009). "U.S. Believes North Korea May Be Preparing Long-Range Missile Test". The Wall Street Journal. ^ Parry, Richard Lloyd (February 3, 2009). "North Korea 'prepares to test long-range missile'". The Times. London. Times Online. [dead link] ^ "US-Seoul alert raised over N Korea". Al Jazeera English. May 28, 2009. ^ Koo, Heejin (August 2, 2009). "U.S. Journalists Say Soldiers Dragged Them Back to North Korea". Bloomberg News. Retrieved 2009-08-02. ^ "N. Korean leader reportedly pardons U.S. journalists". CNN. August 4, 2009. Retrieved 2009-08-04. ^ a b "Alert level raised on North Korea". BBC News. May 28, 2009. ^ "U.S., South Korea plan military exercises". Los Angeles Times. 2010-05-25. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Dogyun, Kim; Steward, Phil (November 24, 2010). "U.S. aircraft carrier heads for Korean waters". Reuters. Retrieved 2010-11-27. ^ Sanger, David E.; McDonald, Mark (November 23, 2010). "South Koreans and U.S. to Stage a Joint Exercise". New York Times. Retrieved 2010-11-27. ^ "A timeline of North Korea's nuclear ambitions". The Economist. 9 September 2016. Retrieved 11 September 2016. ^ Alford, Peter (February 16, 2009). "Clinton reaffirms Japanese alliance". The Australian. Archived from the original on December 15, 2012. Retrieved 2009-02-16. ^ Dilanian, Ken (March 12, 2011). "U.S. military, aid teams headed for Japan". Los Angeles Times. ^ Kyodo News, "Japanese defense chief thanks U.S. military for humanitarian efforts", April 4, 2011. ^ Hodge, Amanda (February 19, 2009). "Obama launches Afghanistan surge". The Australian. Archived from the original on February 19, 2009. ^ "Profile: Baitullah Mehsud". BBC News. December 28, 2007. ^ a b Mark Mazzetti, David E. Sanger (February 20, 2009). "Obama Expands Missile Strikes Inside Pakistan". The New York Times. ^ Scott Shanedec (2009-12-03). "C.I.A. to Expand Use of Drones in Pakistan". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Woods, Chris; Lamb, Christina (4 February 2012). "Obama terror drones: CIA tactics in Pakistan include targeting rescuers and funerals". Bureau of Investigative Journalism. Retrieved 7 February 2012. ^ Woods, Chris (11 August 2011). "Over 160 children reported among drone deaths". Bureau of Investigative Journalism. Retrieved 27 December 2011. ^ "U.N. envoy calls for probe into U.S. drone attacks". CNN. 4 June 2009. ^ Nebehay, Stephanie, "U.N. Investigator Decries U.S. Use Of Killer Drones", Reuters, 19 June 2012 (wire service report) ^ Twining, Dan (February 15, 2009). "A U.S. Asia strategy for Hillary Clinton's trip". Foreign Policy. Retrieved 2012-09-29. ^ Chang, Gordon G. (February 11, 2009). "Mrs. Clinton Goes To China". Forbes. Retrieved 2012-09-29. ^ Varadarajan, Tunku (February 16, 2009). "Obama Should Visit India—Soon". Forbes. Retrieved 2012-09-29. ^ Pham, J. Peter (February 11, 2009). "Ignoring India". The National Interest. Archived from the original on 2010-06-13. Retrieved 2012-09-29. ^ "India frets over Obama's Chinamania". Asia Times Online. ^ Kessler, Glenn (November 8, 2008). "Obama to Face Big Policy Decisions on Iran, N. Korea and Mideast". The Washington Post. Retrieved 2008-11-08. ^ "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 2009-05-11. Retrieved 2009-06-02.CS1 maint: archived copy as title (link) ^ Fred Pleitgen (April 23, 2009). "Soldiers pulled from Iraq duty, sent straight to Afghanistan". CNN.com. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Combat brigades in Iraq under different name — Army News | News from Afghanistan & Iraq". Army Times. 19 August 2010. ^ a b "Bahrain stung by Obama comment on sectarian tensions". Reuters. September 26, 2013. ^ a b c "OBAMA: 'THE FATE OF IRAQ HANGS IN THE BALANCE'". Business Insider. Retrieved 2016-10-12. ^ a b "The good and the bad: President Obama's military options in Iraq". CNN. June 19, 2014. Retrieved 2016-10-12. ^ "300 More U.S. Troops Going to Iraq to Protect Americans". NBC News. Retrieved 2016-10-12. ^ Brown, Hayes (2014-07-06). "How Nearly 800 U.S. Troops Spent Their Fourth Of July In Iraq". ThinkProgress. Retrieved 2016-10-12. ^ "Statement by the President". obamawhitehouse.archives.gov. 2014-08-07. Retrieved 2016-10-12. ^ a b Hooman Majd, Think Again: Iran’s Green Movement: It's a civil rights movement, not a revolution, Foreign Policy (January 6, 2017). ^ a b c Josh Levs, Fact Check: Was Obama 'silent' on Iran 2009 protests?, CNN (October 9, 2012). ^ Eli Lake (Aug 24, 2016). "Why Obama Let Iran's Green Revolution Fail". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved 15 April 2017. ^ "Mitt Romney's foreign policy". The Economist. Oct 9, 2012. Retrieved 15 April 2017. ^ "Running out of moves". The Economist. Jan 14, 2012. Retrieved 15 April 2017. ^ "Barack Obama's Middle East policy". The Economist. Mar 24, 2011. Retrieved 15 April 2017. ^ John Pike (2012-08-13). "U.S. Iran Sanctions Threaten Ties With Russia – Official". Globalsecurity.org. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "Iran sanctions bill on oil passed by US House". BBC News. 2013-08-01. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ by Michael O'Brien and Elizabeth Chuck (September 27, 2013). "Obama and Rouhani make history with phone call, thawing three decade freeze between US and Iran". NBC News. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "US-Israel row: Israeli views". BBC News. March 24, 2010. ^ "Clinton rebukes Israel over homes". BBC News. March 12, 2010. ^ Thom Shankersept (2011-09-23). "U.S. Quietly Supplies Israel With Bunker-Busting Bombs". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ John Pike. "Fact Sheet: Advancing Israel's Security and Supporting Peace". Globalsecurity.org. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Gabe Kahn (2011-08-26). "Obama: US Support for Israel 'Sacrosanct'". Israelnationalnews.com. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Balandat, Felix (2014-08-05). "Obama approves $225 million in Iron Dome funding". The Times of Israel. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Julie Pace (2011-09-21). "Obama: No shortcut to peace in Middle East". News.yahoo.com. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Richard Roth (February 18, 2011). "U.S. vetoes U.N. resolution declaring Israeli settlements illegal". CNN.com. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Goldberg, Jeffrey (2 March 2014). "Obama to Israel -- Time Is Running Out". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved 2 March 2014. ^ "Ehud Barak sings praises of Obama administration". CNN. July 30, 2012. ^ Ovadia, TOmerl (July 30, 2012). "Ehud Barak praises Obama". Politico. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Collinson, Stephen; Wright, David; Labott, Elise (December 24, 2016). "US Abstains as UN Demands End to Israeli Settlements". CNN. Retrieved January 7, 2017. ^ Sanger, David E. (December 28, 2016). "Kerry Rebukes Israel, Calling Settlements a Threat to Peace". The New York Times. Retrieved January 7, 2017. ^ Barak, Ravid (December 26, 2016). "Netanyahu on UN Settlement Vote: Israel Will Not Turn the Other Cheek". Haaretz. Retrieved January 7, 2017. ^ "Israel-Palestinians: Netanyahu Condemns John Kerry Speech". BBC. December 29, 2016. Retrieved January 7, 2017. ^ "Israel Halts $6 million to UN to Protest UN Settlements Vote". Fox News (from the Associated Press). January 6, 2017. Retrieved January 7, 2017. ^ "House Overwhelmingly Votes to Condemn UN Resolution on Israel Settlements". Fox News. January 5, 2017. Retrieved January 7, 2017. ^ Cortellessa, Eric (January 6, 2017). "US House Passes Motion Repudiating UN Resolution on Israel". The Times of Israel. Retrieved January 17, 2017. ^ a b c Goldberg, Jeffrey. "The Obama Doctrine". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2016-03-10. ^ Mark Mardell (2013-09-01). "Obama to seek Congress vote on Syria military action". BBC News. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "Hagel: The White House Tried to 'Destroy' Me". Foreign Policy. 2015-12-18. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "Syria crisis: Barack Obama puts military strike on hold". BBC News. Retrieved 2016-03-10. ^ a b "Europeans View Obama's Exit With a Mix of Admiration and Regret". The New York Times. November 6, 2016. ^ "'The Obama Doctrine': Examining White House Foreign Policy". Morning Edition. NPR. Retrieved 2016-03-10. ^ "The war in Syria: The cost of inaction". The Economist. 26 Sep 2015. Retrieved 1 October 2015. ^ "The war in Syria: Grozny rules in Aleppo". The Economist. 1 October 2016. Retrieved 9 October 2016. ^ Nicholas Kristof (20 August 2016). "Syria inaction is Obama's worst mistake". Las Vegas Sun. Retrieved 20 August 2016. ^ Jonathan Schanzer (30 August 2016). "Team Obama's appalling smugness on Syrian refugees". New York Post. Retrieved 31 August 2016. ^ "A reflection on Barack Obama's presidency". The Economist. 24 December 2016. Retrieved 25 December 2016. ^ Geoff Dyer (1 December 2016). "Syria Rebels in Secret Talks With Moscow to End Aleppo Fight". FT. Retrieved 1 December 2016. ^ Putin Is Filling the Middle East Power Vacuum Bloomberg, 3 October 2017. ^ "Remarks by the President to the White House Press Corps". whitehouse.gov. 2012-08-20. Retrieved 2017-04-08. ^ Barnard, Anne; Gordon, Michael R. (2017-04-04). "Worst Chemical Attack in Years in Syria; U.S. Blames Assad". The New York Times. ISSN 0362-4331. Retrieved 2017-04-08. ^ "'We are ready to go': American-led forces move cruise missiles into position for anticipated 48 hour blitz on Syrian targets within days". Mail Online. Retrieved 2017-04-08. ^ "Exclusive: USS Nimitz carrier group rerouted for possible help with Syria". Reuters. 2017-09-01. Retrieved 2017-04-08. ^ "Syria: Russia evacuates citizens ahead of military strikes in the 'next few days'". Telegraph.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-04-08. ^ Gordon, Michael R.; Myers, Steven Lee (2013-09-09). "Obama Calls Russia Offer on Syria Possible 'Breakthrough'". The New York Times. ISSN 0362-4331. Retrieved 2017-04-08. ^ "Amid savage crackdown on protest, Obama welcomes Bahrain prince - World Socialist Web Site". Wsws.org. June 2011. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "Obama urges 'meaningful reform' in Bahrain". Al Jazeera English. 2013-06-06. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "US resumes arms sales to Bahrain. Activists feel abandoned". Christian Science Monitor. 2012-05-14. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "Revealed: America's Arms Sales To Bahrain Amid Bloody Crackdown". ProPublica. 2013-01-15. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Entous, Adam (2011-03-05). "U.S. Wavers on 'Regime Change' in Middle East". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ a b Mazzetti, Mark (13 March 2016). "Quiet Support for Saudis Entangles U.S. in Yemen". New York Times. Retrieved 24 April 2016. ^ Labott, Elise (5 January 2016). "U.S. fears of Iran-Saudi Arabia tensions prompt outreach by John Kerry". CNN. Retrieved 24 April 2016. ^ Black, Ian (20 April 2016). "Obama's chilly reception in Saudi Arabia hints at mutual distrust". The Guardian. Retrieved 24 April 2016. ^ Peter Mitchell (12 March 2016). "Obama to Turnbull on Indonesia, Islam and the Saudis: 'It's complicated'". Sydney Morning Herald. Retrieved 28 May 2016. ^ Anton La Guardia (14 May 2016). "America is tired of policing the Arab world, and vice versa. But pulling out could be just as bad". The Economist. Retrieved 23 May 2016. ^ "Welcome and goodbye: Barack Obama makes a swift trip to Riyadh". The Economist. 21 April 2016. Retrieved 26 April 2016. ^ Sinclair, Harriet (May 21, 2016). "Why this woman wants to sue Saudi Arabia". The Independent. Retrieved May 22, 2016. ^ Mark Mazzetti, Saudi Arabia Warns of Economic Fallout if Congress Passes 9/11 Bill, New York Times (April 15, 2016). ^ Sergio Fabbrini, "Anti-Americanism and US foreign policy: Which correlation?," International Politics (Nov 2010) 47#6 pp 557–573. ^ Deyermond, Ruth (2013). "Assessing the reset: Successes and failures in the Obama administration's Russia policy, 2009–2012". European Security. 22 (4): 500–523. doi:10.1080/09662839.2013.777704. ^ "Barack Obama: Russia is a regional power showing weakness over Ukraine". The Guardian. 25 March 2014. Retrieved 1 November 2014. ^ Интервью немецкому изданию Bild. Часть 2 Kremlin.Ru, 12 January 2016. ^ "Putin disagrees with Obama over Russia's regional status, US exceptionalism". rbth.com. Interfax. 12 January 2016. Retrieved 20 January 2017. ^ "Exclusive Interview with European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker". Euronews. Retrieved November 26, 2016. ^ "US election: The Russia factor: Officials say Moscow's interference is unprecedented. Has the Kremlin achieved its goal?". The FT. November 4, 2016. ^ "US-Russian Feud Over Syria Escalates with Talk of War Crimes". Voanews.com. 2016-10-07. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "Let's Get Putin's Attention". The New York Times. October 5, 2016. ^ "Kremlin: Obama team trying to damage ties with Russia". The Washington Post. November 17, 2016. ^ Obama-led intel fiasco paved way for Russian subversion The Washington Times, 7 December 2017. ^ Paul Adams (2014-03-14). "No Ukraine accord in US-Russia talks". BBC News. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ White House (December 18, 2014). "Statement by the President on the Ukraine Freedom Support Act". obamawhitehouse.archives.gov. Retrieved 31 January 2015. ^ "Obama to visit Canada Feb. 19, PMO confirms". CTV News. January 28, 2009. Archived from the original on June 6, 2009. Retrieved 2011-02-26. ^ "Joint Statement by President Obama and Prime Minister Harper of Canada on Regulatory Cooperation". obamawhitehouse.archives.gov. February 4, 2011. Retrieved 2011-02-26. ^ "PM and U.S. President Obama announce shared vision for perimeter security and economic competitiveness between Canada and the United States – Prime Minister of Canada". Pm.gc.ca. February 4, 2011. Archived from the original on 2011-02-19. Retrieved 2011-02-26. ^ "Barack Obama and Justin Trudeau set a date for first meeting in Washington". Toronto Star. The Canadian Press. December 28, 2015. Retrieved January 2, 2016. ^ Daniel Dale (2016-03-10). "Obama welcomes Trudeau to White House, 'About time, eh?'". Toronto Star. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "Obama on growing friendship with Trudeau - 'What's not to like?'". Swissinfo.ch. 2016-03-11. Archived from the original on 2016-03-18. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "Obama: Cuba policy to be based on 'libertad'". CNN. May 23, 2008. ^ Neill, Morgan (December 5, 2008). "Castro expresses willingness to meet with Obama". CNN. ^ Lacey, Marc; Thompson, Ginger (December 12, 2009). "Cuba Detains a U.S. Contractor". Ocala.com. Retrieved 2012-09-29. ^ "Cuba to insist on Guantanamo base closure – Raul Castro". Itar-Tass. January 22, 2009. ^ Frank, Marc (January 30, 2009). "Fidel Castro demands Obama return Guantanamo base". Reuters. ^ Burns, Robert (April 13, 2009). "Obama Lifting Cuba Travel Restrictions". Huffington Post. AP. ^ Cornwell, Susan (February 25, 2009). "House votes to ease limits on Cuba trade, travel". Reuters. ^ Borghese, Matthew (May 23, 2008). "Obama Promises To Maintain Cuban Embargo". All Headline News. Archived from the original on October 20, 2008. ^ "Obama's Cuba, Latin America policy". Politico. May 23, 2008. ^ "Castro: Obama Embargo Plan Will Cause Cubans to Go Hungry". Associated Press. May 26, 2008. Archived from the original on April 17, 2009. ^ "Key GOP senator calls Cuba embargo ineffective". CNN. February 23, 2009. ^ Brice, Arthur (February 27, 2009). "Panel urges Obama to normalize ties with Cuba". CNN. ^ "Clinton says no consensus on Cuba at OAS". NBC News. June 2, 2009. Retrieved 2012-09-29. ^ "Obama, Cuban President Raul Castro Shake Hands at Nelson Mandela Memorial". ABC News. 2013-12-10. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ Nadeau, Barbie Latza (December 17, 2014). "The Pope's Diplomatic Miracle: Ending the U.S.–Cuba Cold War". The Daily Beast. Retrieved December 18, 2014. ^ Gillin, Joel (2015-04-13). "Cuba Is Obama's Biggest Foreign Policy Success". New Republic. Retrieved 2016-11-09. ^ "Obama announces re-establishment of U.S.-Cuba diplomatic ties". CNN. Retrieved July 1, 2015. ^ Whitefield, Mimi (July 20, 2015). "United States and Cuba reestablish diplomatic relations". The Miami Herald. Retrieved July 19, 2015. ^ Julie Hirschfeld Davis and Damien Cave (March 21, 2016). "Obama Arrives in Cuba, Heralding New Era After Decades of Hostility". The New York Times. p. A1. ^ "Honduras' Zelaya says to meet coup backers on Thursday". Reuters. July 7, 2009. ^ "U.S. Assistance to Honduras (Taken Question)". State.gov. July 7, 2009. Retrieved 2012-09-29. ^ "Honduran President-Elect Banking on US Support". [dead link] ^ a b c Vaughn, Bruce (2011). "New Zealand: Background and Bilateral Relations with the United States" (PDF). Congressional Research Service. pp. 1–17. Retrieved 3 July 2013. ^ "Military combat exercise with US first for 27 years". New Zealand Herald. April 11, 2012. Retrieved 2012-04-11. ^ a b "NZ Navy ship docks at US base in Guam as relations thaw". One News. March 31, 2013. Retrieved 2013-03-31. ^ a b "Full text of the Wellington Declaration". Stuff.co.nz. NZPA. 4 November 2010. Retrieved 30 October 2011. ^ "Key wraps up US visit". Stuff.co.nz. 23 July 2013. Retrieved 4 July 2013. ^ "Final group of Kiwi soldiers return home from Afghanistan". New Zealand Herald. 20 April 2013. Retrieved 4 July 2013. ^ "United States, New Zealand Sign Defense Cooperation Arrangement". U.S. Department of Defense. 19 June 2012. Retrieved 4 July 2013. ^ "Washington Declaration on Defense Cooperation between The Department of Defense of the United States and the New Zealand Ministry of Defence and the New Zealand Defence Force" (PDF). New Zealand Herald. 19 June 2012. Retrieved 4 July 2013. ^ Ayson, Robert; David Capie (17 July 2012). "Part of the Pivot? The Washington Declaration and US-NZ Relations" (PDF). Asia Pacific Bulletin (172). ^ Gilbert, Jonathan (March 23, 2016). "President Obama's Argentina Visit Is All About Trade". Fortune. Retrieved March 23, 2016. ^ "Remarks by President Obama and President Macri of Argentina in Joint Press Conference". White House Office of the Press Secretary obamawhitehouse.archives.gov. February 5, 2017. Retrieved March 24, 2016. ^ Davis, Julie Hirschfield; Gilbert, Jonathan (March 23, 2016). "Obama Declares a New Partnership After Talks With Argentine Leader". The New York Times. Retrieved March 24, 2016. ^ a b c d Toosi, Nahal (1 February 2016). "Obama tees up a much-needed foreign policy win in Colombia". Politico. Retrieved 18 February 2016. ^ Lederman, Josh (4 February 2016). "Peace Deal in Reach, Obama Says US to Help Colombia Rebuild". Associated Press. Retrieved 18 February 2016. ^ "Congressional Budget Justification Volume 2 FOREIGN OPERATIONS" U.S. Department of State, 2014 ^ Obama / Clinton on meeting anti-US leaders. CNN/YouTube. February 7, 2008. Archived from the original on July 17, 2009. ^ Miller, Michael (18 February 2009). "Chávez's Latest Victory an Opportunity for Obama". Newsweek. ^ "Venezuela President Chavez Ready to Talk to US President Obama". Novinite. February 15, 2009. ^ "'Couldn't care less' about meeting Obama: Chavez". AFP. February 27, 2009. Archived from the original on February 28, 2009. ^ Ramjeet, Oscar (February 2, 2009). "Obama and Chavez to meet in Trinidad in April". Caribbean Net News. Archived from the original on February 5, 2009. ^ "Venezuela's Chavez calls Obama "ignoramus"". Reuters. March 22, 2009. Retrieved 2012-09-29. ^ NSA leaks strain US-German relationship, retrieved 2016-10-12 ^ Murray, Warren (2013-06-13). "Edward Snowden's NSA surveillance revelations strain China-US relations". The Guardian. ISSN 0261-3077. Retrieved 2016-10-12. ^ "NSA revelations strain U.S. relations with a friendly Brazil". Pew Research Center. 2013-09-18. Retrieved 2016-10-12. ^ Karnitschnig, Matthew (February 9, 2014). "NSA Flap Strains Ties With Europe". The Wall Street Journal. ^ "Insight: How U.S. spying cost Boeing multibillion-dollar jet contract". Reuters. December 20, 2013. ^ "Revelations of N.S.A. Spying Cost U.S. Tech Companies". The New York Times. March 21, 2014. ^ "NSA Spying Risks $35 Billion in U.S. Technology Sales". Bloomberg. ^ a b c "Obama tells Al Arabiya peace talks should resume". Al Arabiya. January 27, 2009. Archived from the original on 2010-02-10. Retrieved 2009-02-08. ^ a b MacLeod, Scott (January 28, 2009). "How Al-Arabiya Got the Obama Interview". Time. ^ "Obama reaches out to Muslim world". BBC News. BBC. April 6, 2009. ^ a b "U.S. Confirms First Special Representative To Muslim Communities". Radio Free Europe. September 16, 2009. ^ "Obama explains 'flexibility' on missile defense". USA Today. March 27, 2012. Retrieved April 13, 2013. ^ Gordon, Michael R. (April 13, 2013). "Kerry Makes Arms Overture To Woo China". New York Times. Retrieved April 13, 2013. Further reading[edit] Bentley, Michelle, and Jack Holland, eds. The Obama Doctrine: A Legacy of Continuity in US Foreign Policy? (Routledge, 2016). Bentley, Michelle and Jack Holland, eds. Obama's Foreign Policy: Ending the War on Terror (Routledge Studies in US Foreign Policy) (2013) excerpt and text search Bose, Meena. "Appraising the foreign policy legacy of the Obama presidency." in Wilbur C. Rich, ed., Looking Back on President Barack Obama’s Legacy (Palgrave Macmillan, Cham, 2019) pp. 93-113. Bush, Richard C. "United States Policy towards Northeast Asia" SERI Quarterly (2013) 6#2 online re China and Korea Calculli, Marina. "Mirage of Retrenchment: Obama and the Syrian Conflict." in Marco Clementi et al. eds., US Foreign Policy in a Challenging World (Springer, 2017) pp 279–296. Green, Michael J. By more than providence: grand strategy and American power in the Asia Pacific since 1783 (2017) a major scholarly survey excerpt pp 518–40. Guerlain, Pierre. "Obama's foreign policy: 'smart power,' realism and cynicism." Society 51#5 (2014), p. 482+. online, a view from Paris Inbar, Efraim, and Jonathan Rynhold, eds. US foreign policy and global standing in the 21st century: Realities and perceptions (Routledge, 2016). Gilboa, Eytan. "Public opinion and Obama’s foreign policy." in Efraim Inbar and Jonathan Rynhold, eds., US Foreign Policy and Global Standing in the 21st Century: Realities and Perceptions (2016): 63-88.* Indurthy, Rathnam. "The Obama Administration's Strategy in Afghanistan," International Journal on World Peace (Sept 2011) 28#3 pp 7–52. Indyk, Martin S., Kenneth G. Lieberthal and Michael E. O'Hanlon. Bending History: Barack Obama's Foreign Policy (Brookings FOCUS Book) (2012) excerpt and text search Koffler, Keith Does Obama have any Foreign Policy successes? (2014), [1] general assessment by country Krieg, Andreas. "Externalizing the burden of war: the Obama Doctrine and US foreign policy in the Middle East." International Affairs 92.1 (2016): 97-113. Laïdi, Zaki. Limited Achievements: Obama's Foreign Policy (2012), a view from Paris Lofflman, Georg. "The Obama Doctrine and Military Intervention." Perceptions 25#1 (2019), p. 59+. online Mann, James. The Obamians: The Struggle Inside the White House to Redefine American Power (2012) Nau, Henry R. "Obama's foreign policy." Policy Review , no. 160, 2010, p. 27+. [https://link.gale.com/apps/doc/A225252069/GPS?u=wikipedia&sid=GPS&xid=e1291494 online from the Heritage Foundation O'Hanlon, Michael E., et al. Bending History: Barack Obama's Foreign Policy (Brookings FOCUS Book) (2012) Rasul-Ronning, Zubaida. Conflicted Power: Obama's US Foreign and Strategic Policy in a Shifting World Order (2012) excerpt and text search Sanger, David E. Confront and Conceal: Obama's Secret Wars and Surprising Use of American Power (2012) Singh, Robert, Barack Obama's Post-American Foreign Policy: The Limits of Engagement (2012) excerpt and text search Watson, Robert P., ed. The Obama Presidency: A Preliminary Assessment (State University of New York Press; 2012) 443 pages; essays by scholars Primary sources[edit] Davis, John, ed. Foreign Policy Speeches of Obama (2011) External links[edit] The Obama Moment: European and American Perspectives European Union Institute for Security Studies Travels of the Obama Presidency – slideshow by ABC News How the World Sees Barack Obama – slideshow by Life v t e Barack Obama 44th President of the United States (2009–2017) U.S. Senator from Illinois (2005–2008) Illinois Senator from the 13th district (1997–2004) Life and politics Early life and career Illinois Senate career 2004 Democratic National Convention U.S. Senate career Political positions Administration foreign policy Economic Energy Loggerhead sea turtles Mass surveillance Social Space Nobel Peace Prize West Wing Week Presidency Transition 2009 inauguration 2013 inauguration First 100 days Timeline 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 January 2017 Foreign policy War in Afghanistan Iraq withdrawal Death of Osama bin Laden Benghazi attack Iran deal Cuban thaw Obama Doctrine Health Care reform Healthy, Hunger-Free Kids Act New START Pardons Presidential trips international 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 Judicial appointments Supreme Court controversies Cabinet Presidential Library and Center Executive Orders Presidential Proclamations Books Dreams from My Father (1995) The Audacity of Hope (2006) Of Thee I Sing (2010) Speeches "The Audacity of Hope" (2004) "Yes We Can" (2008) "A More Perfect Union" (2008) "Change Has Come to America" (2008) "A New Birth of Freedom" (2009) Joint session of Congress (2009) "A New Beginning" (2009) Joint session of Congress (health care reform) (2009) State of the Union Address 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 Tucson memorial speech (2011) Joint session of Congress (jobs) (2011) "You didn't build that" (2012) Selma 50th anniversary (2015) Farewell address (2017) Elections Illinois State Senate election, 1996, 1998, 2002 2000 Illinois's 1st congressional district election 2004 United States Senate election 2008 Democratic presidential primaries 2012 2008 Obama primary campaign Democratic National Convention 2008 2012 2008 Presidential campaign endorsements GOP/conservative support 2008 Presidential election 2012 Presidential campaign endorsements 2012 Presidential election international reactions Family Michelle Obama (wife) Ann Dunham (mother) Barack Obama Sr. (father) Lolo Soetoro (step-father) Maya Soetoro-Ng (maternal half-sister) Stanley Armour Dunham (maternal grandfather) Madelyn Dunham (maternal grandmother) Marian Shields Robinson (mother-in-law) Craig Robinson (brother-in-law) Bo (family dog) Sunny (family dog) Public image News and political events Oprah Winfrey's endorsement Citizenship conspiracy theories litigation legislation Religion conspiracy theories Bill Ayers controversy Jeremiah Wright controversy Republican and conservative support (2008) Assassination threats 2008 Denver 2008 Tennessee First inauguration invitations Inaugural Celebration at the Lincoln Memorial Citizen's Briefing Book Tea Party protests New Energy for America Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act of 2009 American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 Gates-Crowley Rose Garden meeting Firing of Shirley Sherrod Impeachment efforts Books about Bibliography Obama: From Promise to Power Barack Obama: Der schwarze Kennedy Redemption Song The Case Against Barack Obama The Obama Nation Culture of Corruption Catastrophe Barack and Michelle The Speech The Obama Story Game Change Game Change 2012 Rising Star Music Obama Girl "I Got a Crush... on Obama" "Barack the Magic Negro" will.i.am "Yes We Can" "We Are the Ones" "There's No One as Irish as Barack O'Bama" "Sí Se Puede Cambiar" "My President" "Deadheads for Obama" "Air and Simple Gifts" Change Is Now Hope! – Das Obama Musical "Barack Obama vs. Mitt Romney" Barack's Dubs "Signed, Sealed, Delivered I'm Yours" Film By the People: The Election of Barack Obama (2009) Change (2010) 2016: Obama's America (2012) The Road We've Traveled (2012) Southside with You (2016) Barry (2016) Other media On social media Artists for Obama "Hope" poster "Joker" poster Situation Room President Barack Obama (2018 portrait) Obama logo In comics Miscellaneous Barack Obama Day (Illinois) Obama Day (Kenya) Awards and honors Namesakes "One Last Time (44 Remix)" ← George W. Bush Donald Trump → Book Category v t e Hillary Clinton 67th United States Secretary of State (2009–2013) U.S. senator from New York (2001–2009) First Lady of the United States (1993–2001) Secretary of State Tenure as Secretary Quadrennial Diplomacy and Development Review Foreign policy of the Obama administration Hillary Doctrine Email controversy UN Security Council Resolution 1888 UN Special Representative on Sexual Violence in Conflict U.S. senator Senate career Family Entertainment Protection Act Flag Protection Act of 2005 First Lady 1993 health care reform Hillaryland Travel office controversy FBI files controversy "Vast right-wing conspiracy" Vital Voices Save America's Treasures State Children's Health Insurance Program Adoption and Safe Families Act Foster Care Independence Act White House Millennium Council National Millennium Trail Arkansas Arkansas Advocates for Children and Families Rose Law Firm Legal Services Corporation Whitewater controversy Cattle futures controversy Philanthropic Clinton Foundation State Department controversy Onward Together Speeches and policies Political positions "Women's Rights Are Human Rights" (1995) "Basket of deplorables" (2016) Writings Bibliography Senior thesis (1969) It Takes a Village (1996) Dear Socks, Dear Buddy (1998) An Invitation to the White House (2000) Living History (2003) Hard Choices (2014) Stronger Together (2016) What Happened (2017) The Book of Gutsy Women (2019) Electoral history New York senatorial elections 2000 2006 2008 Democratic Party presidential primaries campaign endorsements debates convention 2016 United States presidential election campaign endorsements political non-political Democratic primaries debates convention General election debates Hillary Victory Fund Legacy Awards and honors Books about Cultural and political image Popular culture Saturday Night Live parodies Hillary and Clinton (2016 play) Hillary (2020 documentary) Family Bill Clinton (husband presidency) Chelsea Clinton (daughter) Hugh E. Rodham (father) Dorothy Howell Rodham (mother) Hugh Rodham (brother) Tony Rodham (brother) Socks (cat) Buddy (dog) Whitehaven (house) Book v t e John Kerry 68th United States Secretary of State (2013–2017) U.S. Senator from Massachusetts (1985–2013) Born (1943-12-11)December 11, 1943 Career Military career 2004 Democratic National Convention 2004 campaign VP selection process Kerry–Feingold Amendment Sponsored legislation Elections Senate election, 1984 Senate election, 1990 Senate election, 1996 Senate election, 2002 2004 United States presidential election Senate election, 2008 Related Going Upriver The New Soldier Military service controversy swiftboating Unfit for Command Family Forbes family Teresa Heinz Julia Thorne Alexandra Kerry Vanessa Kerry Richard Kerry Rosemary Forbes Kerry Cameron Kerry v t e Public policy of the United States Agricultural Arctic Climate change G. W. Bush Domestic Reagan G. W. Bush Drug Economic Clinton G. W. Bush Obama Trump Energy Obama Environmental Trump Fiscal Foreign history criticism Trump Gun control Clinton Immigration Trump Low-level radioactive waste Monetary Native American Nixon Obama Nuclear energy Science Social Obama Trump Space G. W. Bush Obama Trump Stem cell Telecommunications Trade Visa v t e History of United States foreign policy 1776–1801 1801–1829 1829–1861 1861–1897 1897–1913 1913–1933 Roosevelt Truman Eisenhower Kennedy L. Johnson Nixon Ford Carter Reagan George H. W. Bush Clinton George W. Bush Obama Trump List of presidents Category Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Foreign_policy_of_the_Barack_Obama_administration&oldid=953631038" Categories: History of the foreign relations of the United States Foreign policy of the Barack Obama administration Foreign policy by government Hidden categories: All articles with dead external links Articles with dead external links from April 2014 CS1 maint: archived copy as title All articles with unsourced statements Articles with unsourced statements from March 2014 Articles with unsourced statements from November 2016 Articles with unsourced statements from April 2014 Navigation menu Personal tools Not logged in Talk Contributions Create account Log in Namespaces Article Talk Variants Views Read Edit View history More Search Navigation Main page Contents Featured content Current events Random article Donate to Wikipedia Wikipedia store Interaction Help About Wikipedia Community portal Recent changes Contact page Tools What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Wikidata item Cite this page Print/export Create a book Download as PDF Printable version Languages 日本語 Português Edit links This page was last edited on 28 April 2020, at 06:59 (UTC). Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view